Hawaii, session 2026, SB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that addressing the mental health crisis affecting the residents of Hawaii, particularly veterans who face disproportionately high rates of suicide and post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD), is of the utmost importance. Suicide is a leading cause of death among veterans, with studies indicating that veterans are at a significantly higher risk of suicide compared to the general population, underscoring the urgent need for innovative and effective mental health interventions. The legislature further finds that the United States Food and Drug Administration has granted breakthrough therapy designation to emerging treatments, such as MDMA-assisted therapy for PTSD and psilocybin therapy for treatment-resistant depression, recognizing their potential to offer rapid and substantial improvements over existing treatments.  These therapies, when administered in clinical settings with the proper safeguards, have demonstrated promising results in reducing symptoms of PTSD and suicidal ideation, particularly among veterans who have not responded to conventional treatments. The legislature also finds that establishing a mental health emerging therapies pilot project within the office of wellness and resilience, using private moneys to match state funds, will enable the State to assess the feasibility, effectiveness, and accessibility of these cutting-edge therapies for individuals in Hawaii who could stand to benefit the most.  By investing in evidence-based emerging therapies through the pilot project, the State can lead the way in expanding mental health care options, improving health outcomes, and reducing veteran suicide rates. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a two-year mental health emerging therapies pilot program within the office of wellness and resilience. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established a two-year mental health emerging therapies pilot program within the office of wellness and resilience to support clinical research and the development of emerging therapies for the treatment of mental health and behavioral health disorders. (b) The pilot program may: (1)  Establish partnerships with public and private stakeholders, such as public agencies, academic institutions, health care providers, or any other as the office of wellness and resilience may deem appropriate; (2)  Fund phase three clinical trials of treatments or therapies that have received a breakthrough-therapy designation from the United States Food and Drug Administration, investor-initiated clinical trails, or other clinical trials, including trials to: (A)  Inform optimal methods of treatment delivery; (B)  Inform transdiagnostic safety and efficacy; and (C)  Inform patient access, patient support services, and real world data collection and analysis; (3)  Fund education and training opportunities for mental health professionals; (4)  Support public education and harm reduction; (5)  Fund implementation studies, including research and analyses of best practices, cost effectiveness, and methods to reduce treatment costs; and (6)  Provide recommendations for expanding patient access, patient support services, and other means by which those with mental health and behavioral health needs may access emerging therapies. (c) The office of wellness and resilience may contract with a third party to administer funding under the mental health emerging therapies pilot program. (d) The office of wellness and resilience may adopt rules without regard to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to administer the pilot program. (e) The office of wellness and resilience shall submit a report of its activities to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. Each report shall include but not be limited to: (1)  The studies funded and efforts supported by the mental health emerging therapies pilot program in the previous year; (2)  Any findings and recommendations; and (3)  Any proposed legislation. (f) The mental health emerging therapies pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2027. (g) For the purposes of this Act, "emerging therapies" means any psychedelic or entactogenic compound or mixture that is: (1)  Undergoing clinical trials regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of mental health or behavioral health conditions; (2)  Approved by the United States Food and Drug administration for marketing in interstate commerce; or (3)  Approved for medical use under state law. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the mental health emerging therapies pilot program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of wellness and resilience for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.